Louisiana, session 2026, HB321.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:46.2(F)(1), 46.3(A)(1) and (E), 82(G), 82.1(A)(introductory
paragraph) and (1), (B), (D)(2) and (3)(b), (E), and (F), 82.2(E), 83(C), 83.3(D), 83.4(C),
89(C)(2), and 89.2(D)(1) and (5) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 14:83.1(C),
83.2(C), and 84(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§46.2. Human trafficking
* * *
Page 1 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
F.(1) A victim of trafficking involving services that include commercial
sexual activity or a sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541 shall have an affirmative
defense to prosecution for any of the following offenses which were committed as
a direct result of being trafficked:
(a) R.S. 14:82 (Prostitution).
(b) R.S. 14:83 (Soliciting for prostitutes).
(b) (c) R.S. 14:83.3 (Prostitution by massage).
(c) (d) R.S. 14:83.4 (Massage; sexual conduct prohibited).
(d) (e) R.S. 14:89 (Crime against nature).
(e) (f) R.S. 14:89.2 (Crime against nature by solicitation).
* * *
§46.3. Trafficking of children for sexual purposes
A. It shall be unlawful:
(1) For any person to knowingly recruit, harbor, transport, provide, sell,
receive, isolate, entice, obtain, or maintain the use of a person under the age of
eighteen years child for the purpose of engaging in commercial sexual activity. For
the purposes of this Section, "child" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
* * *
E.(1) No victim of trafficking as provided by the provisions of this Section
shall be prosecuted for unlawful acts committed as a direct result of being trafficked.
Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection
shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually exploited children.
(2) Any child who is engaged in prostitution or prostitution-related offenses
is presumed to be a victim of human trafficking. A child victim of trafficking as
provided by the provisions of this Section is exempt from criminal responsibility and
delinquency proceedings for prostitution-related offenses.
(3) Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection is eligible for specialized services for sexually exploited children as
provided in R.S. 46:2161.
* * *
Page 2 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
§82. Prostitution; definition; penalties; enhancement
* * *
G.(1) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
was a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes as provided in R.S.
14:46.3(E). Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually exploited children.
Any child who is engaged in prostitution is presumed to be a victim of human
trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E) and is exempt from criminal responsibility
and delinquency proceedings for such offenses. A child victim of human trafficking
shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services for victims of human
trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(F). Any person, eighteen years of age or older, who is determined to be a
victim pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph of human trafficking shall be
notified of any treatment or specialized services for human trafficking victims or
sexually exploited persons to the extent that such services are available.
§82.1. Prostitution; persons under eighteen; additional offenses
A. It shall be unlawful to do any of the following:
(1) For any person over the age of seventeen to engage in sexual intercourse
with any person under the age of eighteen who is practicing prostitution, who
receives or agrees to receive anything of value as compensation for such activity and
there is an age difference of greater than two years between the two persons.
* * *
B.(1) Lack of knowledge of the age of the person practicing prostitution who
the offender engages in sexual intercourse with shall not be a defense.
Page 3 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
(2) It shall not be a defense to prosecution for a violation of this Section that
the person practicing prostitution who the offender engages in sexual intercourse
with consented to the activity prohibited by this Section.
* * *
D.
* * *
(2) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section when
the person practicing prostitution who the offender engages in sexual intercourse
with is under the age of fourteen shall be fined not more than seventy-five thousand
dollars, imprisoned at hard labor for not less than twenty-five years nor more than
fifty years, or both. Twenty-five years of the sentence imposed shall be without
benefit of parole, probation, or suspension of sentence.
(3)
* * *
(b) Whoever violates the provisions of Paragraph (A)(2) of this Section when
the person practicing prostitution who the offender engages in sexual intercourse
with is under the age of fourteen shall be required to serve at least ten years of the
sentence imposed in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection without benefit of parole,
probation, or suspension of sentence.
E. It shall not be a defense to prosecution for a violation of this Section that
the person practicing prostitution who is believed who the offender engages in sexual
intercourse with and who the offender believes to be under the age of eighteen is
actually a law enforcement officer or peace officer acting within the official scope
of his duties.
F. Any person determined to be a victim of this offense shall be eligible for
specialized services for sexually exploited children. Any person under the age of
eighteen years who is determined to be a victim of this offense shall be referred and
is eligible for specialized services for victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S.
46:2161.
Page 4 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
§82.2. Purchase of commercial sexual activity; penalties
* * *
E.(1) Any child person under the age of eighteen years who is determined
to be a victim of this offense shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually
exploited children victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) Any person, eighteen years of age or older, who is determined to be a
victim of this offense shall be notified of any treatment or specialized services for
human trafficking victims or sexually exploited persons to the extent that such
services are available.
* * *
§83. Soliciting for prostitutes
* * *
C.(1) Any child who is identified to be a victim of the crime of soliciting for
prostitutes shall be referred and be eligible for specialized services for victims of
human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.2 or trafficking of children for sexual
purposes pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3. In accordance with R.S. 14:46.3(E), no victim
of trafficking of children for sexual purposes shall be prosecuted for a violation of
this Section if such violation is committed as a direct result of being trafficked. Any
child who is engaged in prostitution-related offenses is presumed to be a victim of
human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E) and is exempt from criminal
responsibility and delinquency proceedings for such offenses. A child victim of
human trafficking shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services for victims
of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(F). Any other person who is eighteen years of age or older who is identified
as determined to be a victim of the crime of soliciting for prostitutes human
trafficking shall be notified of any treatment or specialized services for human
Page 5 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
trafficking victims or sexually exploited persons to the extent that such services are
available.
§83.1. Inciting prostitution
* * *
C.(1) Any person under the age of eighteen years who is determined to be
a victim of this offense shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services for
victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older who is determined to
be a victim of human trafficking shall be notified of any treatment or specialized
services for human trafficking victims or sexually exploited persons to the extent that
such services are available.
§83.2. Promoting prostitution
* * *
C.(1) Any person under the age of eighteen years who is determined to be
a victim of this offense shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services for
victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older who is determined to
be a victim of human trafficking shall be notified of any treatment or specialized
services for human trafficking victims or sexually exploited persons to the extent that
such services are available.
§83.3. Prostitution by massage
* * *
D.(1) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
was a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes as provided in R.S.
14:46.3(E). Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually exploited children.
Any person under the age of eighteen years who is engaged in prostitution-related
offenses is presumed to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E)
and is exempt from criminal responsibility and delinquency proceedings for such
Page 6 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
offenses. A child victim of human trafficking shall be referred and is eligible for
specialized services for victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(F). Any person, eighteen years of age or older, who is determined to be a
victim pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph of human trafficking shall be
notified of any treatment or specialized services for human trafficking victims or
sexually exploited persons to the extent that such services are available.
§83.4. Massage; sexual conduct prohibited
* * *
C.(1) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
was a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes as provided in R.S.
14:46.3(E). Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually exploited children.
Any child who is engaged in prostitution-related offenses is presumed to be a victim
of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E) and is exempt from criminal
responsibility and delinquency proceedings for such offenses. A child victim of
human trafficking shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services for victims
of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(F). Any person, eighteen years of age or older, who is determined to be a
victim pursuant to the provisions of this Paragraph of human trafficking shall be
notified of any treatment or specialized services for human trafficking victims or
sexually exploited persons to the extent that such services are available.
Page 7 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
§84. Pandering
* * *
C.(1) Any child who is engaged in prostitution-related offenses is presumed
to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E) and is exempt from
criminal responsibility and delinquency proceedings for such offenses. A child
victim of human trafficking shall be referred and is eligible for specialized services
for victims of human trafficking.
(2) Any person who is eighteen years of age or older who is determined to
be a victim of human trafficking shall be notified of any treatment or specialized
services for human trafficking victims or sexually exploited persons to the extent that
such services are available.
* * *
§89. Crime against nature
* * *
C.
* * *
(2) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of
Paragraph (A)(1) of this Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of
the offense, the defendant is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant
to the provisions of R.S. 14:46.2(F). Any person determined to be a victim pursuant
to the provisions of this Paragraph shall be notified of any treatment or specialized
services for victims of human trafficking and sexually exploited persons to the extent
that such services are available.
* * *
§89.2. Crime against nature by solicitation
* * *
D.(1) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
was a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes as provided in R.S.
14:46.3(E). Any child determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Page 8 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
Paragraph of this offense shall be eligible for specialized services for sexually
exploited children victims of human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 46:2161.
* * *
(5) It shall be an affirmative defense to prosecution for a violation of this
Section that, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, the defendant
is determined to be a victim of human trafficking pursuant to the provisions of R.S.
14:46.2(F). Any person determined to be a victim pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph of this offense shall be notified of any treatment or specialized services
for victims of human trafficking and sexually exploited persons, including but not
limited to the services provided for by R.S. 46:2161.1, to the extent that such
services are available.
Section 2. Children's Code Articles 804(3) and (5) and 839(D) are hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 804. Definitions
As used in this Title:
* * *
(3) "Delinquent act" means an act committed by a child of ten years of age
or older which if committed by an adult is designated an offense under pursuant to
the statutes or ordinances of this state, or of another state if the offense occurred
there, or under federal law, except traffic violations. It includes an act constituting
an offense under pursuant to R.S. 14:95.8, an act constituting an offense under
pursuant to R.S. 14:81.1.1(A)(2), and a direct contempt of court committed by a
child. "Delinquent act" shall does not include a violation of R.S. 14:82, 83.3, 83.4,
89, or 89.2 for a child who, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense,
was a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes pursuant to R.S.
14:46.3(E)(2).
* * *
(5) "Felony-grade delinquent act" means an offense that if committed by an
adult, may be punished by death or by imprisonment at hard labor. "Felony-grade
delinquent act" shall does not include a violation of R.S. 14:82, 83.3, 83.4, 89, or
Page 9 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 321 ENROLLED
89.2 for a child who, during the time of the alleged commission of the offense, was
a victim of trafficking of children for sexual purposes pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E)(2).
* * *
Art. 839. Availability of an informal adjustment agreement
* * *
D.(1) Where a petition involves an allegation of an act of prostitution
pursuant to R.S. 14:82, prostitution by massage pursuant to R.S. 14:83.3 or 83.4, or
crimes against nature by solicitation pursuant to R.S. 14:89.2 and it is the child's first
offense unlawful act committed as a direct result of the child being a victim of
human trafficking pursuant to R.S. 14:46.3(E)(1) and the child expresses a
willingness to cooperate and receive specialized services for sexually exploited
children, the district attorney may effect an informal adjustment agreement which
includes specialized services for the child.
(2) If, however, the child has previously been adjudicated a delinquent in
violation of R.S. 14:82, 83.3, 83.4, or 89.2 or is unwilling to cooperate with
specialized services for sexually exploited children, continuing with the delinquency
proceeding shall be within the discretion of the district attorney.
(3) The specialized services referenced in Subparagraph (1) of this Paragraph
may include but are not limited to the services provided pursuant to R.S. 46:2161,
safe and stable housing, victim advocacy services, comprehensive on-site onsite case
management, integrated mental health and chemical dependency services, including
specialized trauma recovery services, education and employment training, and
referrals to off-site offsite specialized services, as appropriate.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.